Tennessee, session 114, HB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-217(d), is amended by deleting
"December 31" and substituting instead "January 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1183
003123
- 1 -